Massachusetts, session 194th, H5506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 112,
§ 74D the following section:- Section 74DD
SECTION 2. As used in this section the following words, shall unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings”
“Contract,” a written agreement, which may be electronic, between a health care worker
and a health care worker platform.
“Health care facility” shall mean a long-term care facility, licensed pursuant to Mass.
Gen. Laws ch. 111 § 71.
“Health care worker” shall mean any health care professional who is licensed, registered
or credentialed pursuant to Mass. Gen. Laws ch. 111-112, including, but not limited to,
registered nurses, licensed practical nurses, certified nurse aids, nurse aids, and dental hygienists,
of 3

and provides health care or directly related health care services to patients at a health care
facility, For purposes of this section, doctors, interns, residents and facility management
personnel shall not be considered a health care worker.
“Health care worker platform” a business entity that maintains and operates an online-
enabled application or platform through which a health care worker can accept one or more shifts
to perform health care or directly related health care services to patients at a health care facility.
SECTION 3. A health care worker platform shall:
(a) have a contract with each health care worker that expressly provides that the health
care worker platform shall not (i) unilaterally prescribe specific dates, times of day, or minimum
numbers of hours that a health care worker must be available to perform health care or directly
related health care services to patients, (ii) condition access to its platform on accepting any
specific shift or number of shifts, (iii) restrict a health care worker from booking shifts through
another platform or pursuing any other lawful business opportunity, (iv) assess a fee or otherwise
require compensation from a health care facility or health care worker if such worker accepts an
offer of employment or other services engagement from such facility, (v) require a health care
worker to use specific equipment, tools, or other supplies, or (vi) prescribe or control the means
and methods for the services performed by an individual at a health care facility; (b) maintain
general and professional liability insurance providing coverage against third-party claims [by
patients] for health care or directly related health care services performed by health care workers
during shifts accepted through a health care worker platform; and (c) maintain occupational
accident coverage or otherwise verify that health care workers maintain substantially similar
coverage applying to health care or directly related health care services performed by health care
of 3

workers during shifts accepted through a health care worker platform or verify that health care
workers maintain workers’ compensation coverage for health care or directly related health care
services performed by health care workers during shifts accepted through a health care worker
platform.
Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a health care worker may choose, in
writing, to affiliate with a health care worker platform as an independent contractor. Such
affiliation will apply exclusively to the performance of health care or directly related health care
services to patients during shifts accepted through the health care worker platform, and shall
have no impact on classification in other circumstances.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the collective bargaining rights of any
health care worker accepting shifts at a health care facility through a health care worker platform.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on December 31, 2026.
of 3